Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1884.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 509.11, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 509.11. A. No school district, employee of a school
district, or employee organization shall deny by any means,
including a collective bargaining agreement, a statewide
professional educators’ association equal access to employees of the
school district, to the same extent that access is granted to other
educators’ associations. For purposes of this section, access shall
include, but is not limited to:
1. Setting up informational tables at in-service or other
similar teacher meetings;
2. Speaking at in-service or other similar teacher meetings;
3. Distributing information in school mail boxes or through the
school e-mail electronic mail system;
4. Utilizing school district meeting rooms during nonworking
hours;
5. Representing employees in employment matters, when requested
by the employee;
6. Posting information on school district bulletin boards or
other common space displays; and
SB1884 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

7. Utilizing school district printing services Promotional
events.
B. Any association which utilizes school district facilities or
services shall reimburse the district for any costs incurred by the
district due to association activities.
C. Equal access shall not be conditional on provisions or
services requested by school districts including, but not limited
to, furnished meals, snacks, gifts, donations, or other types of
sponsored activities.
D. Communication by an employee, volunteer, or member of a
statewide professional educators’ association on behalf of the
association or a local affiliate group that pertains to a collective
bargaining agreement or negotiated employment contract pursuant to
Section 509.2 of this title shall, for the purposes of this section,
be classified as a promotional event hosted by the statewide
association, and all other statewide professional educators’
associations and their employees shall be granted equal access to
communicate with school employees to the same extent. For the
purposes of this section, communication includes, but is not limited
to, presentations, speaking events, meetings, electronic mails,
informational displays, and virtual forum posts. For the purposes
of this section, equal access shall not include communications
between a statewide professional educators’ association and a school
district board of education or its duly designated representatives
SB1884 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

prio r to a collective bargaining agreement or negotiated employment
contract being agreed upon pursuant to Section 509.2 of this title.
E. Distribution of promotional materials to all employees in
school mailboxes by employees or associated members of a statewide
professional educators’ association shall be permitted. Promotional
materials may include, but are not limited to, promotional
brochures, competitor comparison brochures, informational pamphlets,
membership applications, gift items, and association member gifts.
F. School districts shall not require a fee or other payment
from statewide professional educators’ associations for access,
promotional material review, promotional material distribution, or
other related activities.
G. 1. A statewide professional educators’ association that is
not allowed access as provided for in this section shall notify the
board of education of the school district where access was denied.
2. Upon notification, if the school district board of education
does not ensure equal access is provided to the statewide
professional educators’ association within fifteen (15) days, the
association shall notify the State Board of Education.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 509.13 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A school district employee who is a member of an employee
organization designated pursuant to Section 509.2 of Title 70 of the
SB1884 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Okla homa Statutes may terminate membership in the employee
organization at any time. Upon receipt of a school district
employee’s termination of membership via mail or electronic mail,
the employee organization shall terminate the employee’s membership
and cease collection of dues.
B. An employee organization designated pursuant to Section
509.2 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes shall be prohibited from:
1. Limiting a school district employee’s right to terminate his
or her membership only during certain dates or by using specific
forms; and
2. Requiring a school district employee to disclose the reason
for his or her membership termination.
C. 1. No school district board of education policy or
negotiated agreement shall place any other conditions or
requirements on any school district employee to initiate or
terminate membership in an employee organization.
2. Any negotiated agreement in effect upon the effective date
of this act that places any conditions or requirements on any school
district employee to initiate or terminate membership in an employee
organization shall be null and void upon the effective date of this
act.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
SB1884 HFLR Page 5
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON GOVERNMENT OVERSIGHT, dated
04/14/2026 - DO PASS




















SB1884 HFLR Page 6
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.